Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PROGRAM TO ASSIST ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE COMMUNITIES
SECTION 1.
The State Department of Energy shall establish a program to provide  as-
sistance related to  energy projects and activities to environmental justice communities, as
defined in ORS 469A.400. At a minimum,  the program must provide environmental justice
communities with information regarding:
(1) Funding resources.
(2) Technical assistance.
(3) Other support that may be available.
STATE ENERGY STRATEGY
SECTION 2.
(1) The State Department of Energy shall develop a comprehensive state
energy strategy that identifies optimized pathways to achieving the  state’s energy policy
objectives.
(2) The state energy strategy must be informed, at a minimum, by the following:
(a) Stakeholder perspectives;
(b) State laws, policies and targets regarding energy and greenhouse gas emissions;
(c) Existing energy and integrated resource plans;
(d) Energy-related studies and data analysis; and
(e) State energy policy objectives.
(3) In identifying optimized pathways to achieving  the state’s energy policy objectives,
the state energy strategy must take into account, at a minimum, the following factors:
(a) State energy demand and trends;
(b) Energy resources and technology choices in consideration of costs,  energy efficiency,
feasibility and availability;
(c) Economic and employment impacts;
(d) Energy burden and affordability;
Enrolled House Bill 3630 (HB 3630-A) Page 1
(e) Energy resilience, as defined in section 29, chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021,  and energy
reliability;
(f) Environmental justice, as defined in ORS 469A.400;
(g) Land use considerations;
(h) Natural resource impacts;
(i) Emerging technologies and investment opportunities;
(j) Energy generation, transmission and distribution infrastructure  needed to achieve
state energy policy objectives;
(k) Existing and potential  incentives to support energy efficiency, development and de-
ployment;
(L) Energy security and impacts of broader markets;
(m) Community benefits; and
(n) Community energy resilience, as defined in section  29, chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021.
(4)(a) In developing the state  energy strategy, the department shall engage with relevant
state agencies, federally recognized Indian tribes and stakeholders. At a  minimum, the
stakeholders must represent a diverse range of:
(A) Interests, perspectives, expertise and education;
(B) Socioeconomic backgrounds;
(C) Communities; and
(D) Geographic areas of this state.
(b) The department may convene an advisory work group to inform the department on
the department’s engagement with stakeholders and development of the state energy  strat-
egy.
(5)(a) The department shall ensure that the state energy strategy developed under  this
section reflects the best available information, data  analyses and time horizons necessary to
achieving the state’s energy policy objectives.
(b) The department shall periodically update the state energy strategy to reflect  current
information, data analysis and state energy policy objectives.
(c) The department shall inform the Governor and Legislative Assembly when  the de-
partment updates the state energy strategy.
(6) The department may contract with third parties for assistance in  performing the
department’s duties  under this section, including assistance with technical or facilitation
services.
(7) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111,  are directed, to the ex-
tent permitted by laws relating  to confidentiality, to furnish such information and advice to
the department as  the department considers necessary to perform the department’s duties
under this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The State Department of Energy shall produce a report regarding the
state energy strategy developed under section 2 of this 2023 Act. The  report, at minimum,
must:
(a) Summarize the state energy strategy and optimized pathways to achieving the  state’s
energy policy objectives;
(b) Describe the department’s engagement process with stakeholders and  how
stakeholder perspectives informed the state energy strategy; and
(c) Recommend legislation or changes to policy necessary to implement the  state energy
strategy.
(2) The department shall submit the report produced under subsection  (1) of this section
to the Governor and the  appropriate interim committees of the Legislative Assembly in the
manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than November 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
COUNTY ENERGY RESILIENCE PLANS
Enrolled House Bill 3630 (HB 3630-A) Page 2
SECTION 5. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that each county should plan for and de-
velop energy resilience and be prepared, in the event of major grid disruption, to maintain
basic services and functions.
(2) In order to carry out the provisions set forth in subsection (1) of this section,  a
county may:
(a) Develop and adopt an energy resilience plan; and
(b) Incorporate the  energy resilience plan into the county’s applicable natural hazard
mitigation plan.
(3) An energy resilience plan developed under this section must:
(a) Be based on and plan for short-term, medium-term and long-term power outages.
(b) Identify and map:
(A) Existing energy  infrastructure located within the county, including transmission
lines, distribution lines, substations and energy storage systems;
(B) Natural hazard risks; and
(C) Communities that experience social vulnerability.
(c) Identify potential  locations for community resilience centers and communication
zones that the public may use to access electricity services during a power outage;
(d) Inventory the energy consumption needs of critical public services facilities;
(e) Identify  critical public services facilities where the development of alternate energy
generation and storage resources will meet local energy resilience needs;
(f) Identify opportunities to coordinate and locate energy infrastructure  development to
align with and support critical public services facilities;
(g) Identify time schedules, priorities and potential funding  sources for developing energy
resilience; and
(h) Identify other actions and resources needed to implement the energy resilience plan.
(4)(a) To identify and map communities that experience social  vulnerabilities under sub-
section (3)(b)(C) of this section, a county shall consult  with representatives from local envi-
ronmental justice communities.
(b) A county shall use  the locations of communities that experience social vulnerabilities
to prioritize the potential locations of  community resilience centers under subsection (3)(c)
of this section.
(5) A public utility that is operating or serving customers within  the boundaries of a
county that is developing an energy resilience plan shall use reasonable efforts  to assist with
and comply with requests from the county  for information regarding energy infrastructure
that is located or  serving customers within the boundaries of the county, provided that the
information is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.355.
(6) As  used in this section, “critical public services facility” includes a facility related to
law enforcement, fire protection, health and medical services,  sanitation services, fuel and
fueling, public works and engineering,  public information and communications and emer-
gency response.
SECTION 6.
(1) The State Department of Energy shall establish  a program for awarding
grants to counties to cover the costs of developing energy resilience plans that  meet the
requirements under section 5 (3) of this 2023 Act.
(2) Under the program:
(a) A county shall use grant moneys to cover the costs  of developing an energy resilience
plan that meets the requirements listed under section 5 (3) of this 2023 Act;
(b) A county may be awarded a total of no more than $50,000;
(c) Counties may combine and use  together grant moneys that have been awarded to the
counties;
(d) A county may use grant award moneys to cover:
(A) The salaries and expenses of county employees for the time  the employees work on
developing an energy resilience plan;
Enrolled House Bill 3630 (HB 3630-A) Page 3
(B) The costs to hire or contract with a technical assistance provider; and
(C) Any other necessary costs as approved by the department; and
(e) The department may issue grant award moneys to  a county or directly to a technical
assistance provider or providers hired or contracted by the county.
(3) The department shall establish the:
(a) Application process;
(b) Eligibility criteria for awarding grants;
(c) Process of awarding grants; and
(d) Requirements for reporting on the use of grant award moneys by grantees.
(4) No later than September 15, 2025, the  department shall submit a report in the manner
provided by  ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to
energy. The report must, at a minimum:
(a) Identify the counties that have received grants  under the program and describe the
status of the counties’ energy resilience plans;
(b) Identify opportunities to incorporate county energy resilience plans into a  state en-
ergy resilience plan and other planning efforts; and
(c) Make recommendations for improvements to the program and investments that would
improve future planning efforts.
SECTION 7.
Section 6 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
HOME ENERGY PROGRAMS
SECTION 8. (1) The State Department of  Energy, in consultation with the Housing and
Community Services Department, shall establish:
(a) A  whole-home energy savings program to provide rebates to individual homeowners,
multifamily building owners and aggregators for home energy efficiency retrofits; and
(b) A high-efficiency electric home rebate program to provide rebates  for the purchase
and installation of appliances and nonappliance upgrades.
(2) In establishing a program under this section, the State Department of Energy shall:
(a) Consult with stakeholders, including consumer-owned  utilities, as defined in ORS
757.270, and investor-owned utilities, as defined in ORS 469.631; and
(b) Ensure the program maximizes benefits for applicants by leveraging federal and state
resources.
STATE DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY SINGLE RESOURCE
SECTION 9.
(1) The State Department  of Energy shall create a single resource that
provides to interested persons information, technical assistance and assistance in identifying
contractors and financing  options, related to available energy efficiency incentives and pro-
grams.
(2) The department shall  coordinate information and data exchanges between federal and
state agencies,  private and public utility providers, and energy efficiency incentive or pro-
gram providers as may be necessary to:
(a) Create and maintain the single resource described  under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion; and
(b) Support the implementation and reporting requirements of available energy  efficiency
incentives and programs.
(3) The department may contract with a nonprofit  or other entity as may be necessary
to carry out the provisions of this section.
(4) Entities that exchange, compile or maintain information or  data under this section
or that are involved in carrying out the provisions of this section shall  use best practices to
Enrolled House Bill 3630 (HB 3630-A) Page 4
maintain the confidentiality and security of  the information and data as required by federal
and state law, including the Oregon Consumer Information Protection Act and ORS 192.355.
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 10. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the State Department of Energy  by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5016), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for energy develop-
ment services, is increased by $4,238,727  for the purpose of carrying out sections 2 to 8 of
this 2023 Act.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
State Department of Energy, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $402,385, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section  1 of
this 2023 Act.
SECTION 10a. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5016), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by the State Department of Energy, is  increased by
$48,859, for the purpose of carrying out sections 8 and 9 of this 2023 Act.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 11. Sections 2 to 7 of this 2023 Act become operative on the 91st day after the
date on which the 2023 regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns
sine die.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 12.
The unit captions used in this 2023 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
DECLARING EMERGENCY
SECTION 13. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3630 (HB 3630-A) Page 5
Passed by House June 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3630 (HB 3630-A) Page 6